Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB716.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning with academic year 2026-2027, each local school board shall appoint
at least one (1) student representative to attend and participate in school board
meetings, provide student perspective on issues, and learn about school district
governance. The student representative shall not be a voting member but shall be
allowed to provide a nonbinding advisory vote on action items that is recorded in
the minutes of the meeting. The student representative shall not participate in
closed sessions of a school board meeting.
(2) A student representative shall:
(a) Be enrolled in a high school of the district or be a resident of the district
enrolled in a public high school contracted to provide high school service
pursuant to KRS 158.100(1);
(b) Be classified as a junior or senior at the time of appointment;
(c) Have completed the requirement of KRS 158.141; and
(d) Serve at least a one (1) year term.
(3) Each local school board shall adopt a policy to implement this section that
includes but is not limited to the student representative selection process,
eligibility requirements, and terms of service. The policy shall include the
following provisions:
(a) A student representative selection process that shall include an election by
high school students;
(b) An attendance requirement that allows a student representative to be absent
from a maximum of two (2) board meetings;
(c) Authorization for the student representative to use video teleconferencing in
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/5/2025 3:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 75
meetings in the same manner as other members of the school board under
KRS 61.805 to 61.850; and
(d) A requirement that the student representative be afforded full participation
in board meetings the same as other school board members, except as
provided in subsection (1) of this subsection.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/5/2025 3:35 PM Jacketed